District of Columbia statutes.
26-904

Register to be kept; contents; inspection; annual statements.

Every person, firm, voluntary association, joint-stock company, incorporated society, or corporation conducting such business shall keep a register, approved by said Mayor, showing in English, the amount of money loaned, the date when loaned and when due, the person to whom loaned, the property or thing named as security for the loan, where the same is located and in whose possession, the amount of interest, all fees, commissions, charges, and renewals charged, under whatever name. Such register shall be open for inspection to the said Mayor, his officers and agents, on every day, except Sundays and legal holidays, between the hours of 9:00 in the forenoon and 5:00 in the afternoon. Every such person, firm, voluntary association, joint-stock company, incorporated society, or corporation conducting such business shall, on or before the 20th day of January of each year, make to the said Mayor an annual statement in the form of a trial balance of its books on the 31st day of December in each year, specifying the different kinds of its liabilities and the different kinds of its assets, stating the amount of each, together with such other information as may be called for.

History

Feb. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 658, ch. 26, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-704.
1973 Ed., § 26-604.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.